Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-728
Fishing; privately owned land; statement required; false statement; penalty.

Whenever an invitee takes fish in any body of water which is entirely upon privately owned land and which is entirely privately stocked and the invitee wishes to remove the fish from the premises, the owner or operator by consent of the owner shall furnish to such invitee a written statement setting forth the name of the owner, the name of the invitee, the number of fish taken, and that such fish were taken in a body of water which is entirely upon privately owned land and which is entirely privately stocked. Any person who makes or exhibits to a conservation officer or other peace officer a false statement of the facts required by this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1959, c. 149, § 3, p. 566;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 177;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-213.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 342;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 97.